Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB256.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), on or before July
1, 2025, all full-time employees of each state agency shall perform such
employees' duties in the assigned office, facility or field location of such
employees.
(b) Each agency head may grant exceptions to the requirements of
subsection (a) for:
(1) Employees with nonstandard work hours, including, evenings,
weekends or holidays;
(2) positions where in-office employment is deemed unreasonable; or
(3) office space constraints that would require additional expenditures
of the state agency to accommodate employees.
(c) On or before August 1, 2025, each state agency shall submit to the
department of administration the number of exceptions granted by the
agency head and any other information deemed necessary by the
department of administration for purposes of making the report required
by this subsection. Such information shall be submitted on a form and in
the manner prescribed by the department of administration. On or before
October 1, 2025, the department of administration shall submit a report to
the senate committee on government efficiency that includes:
(1) A list of the state agencies granting exceptions;
(2) the number of exceptions granted by each agency head;
(3) the job descriptions or job titles for each exception;
(4) the number of buildings each state agency leases and the annual
cost of each lease agreement; and
(5) the percentage of full-time employees assigned to a physical
building that are working entirely remote or a hybrid of in-office and
remote work.
(d) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Agency head" means an individual or body of individuals in

SB 256 2
whom the ultimate legal authority of a state agency is vested by any
provision of law; and
(2) "state agency" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 75-3701, and
amendments thereto.
(e) The provisions of this section shall be known and may be cited as
the back to work act.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.